Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.130

Binding arbitration procedures authorized.

An employer and an exclusive bargaining representative who enter into a collective bargaining agreement may include in such agreement procedures for binding arbitration of such disputes as may arise involving the interpretation or application of such agreement.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 14.]